Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6039.06
Eligibility for Licensee Assistance Program.

Nursing assistants and paid dining assistants are eligible to participate in the Licensee Assistance Program as prescribed by section 38-175.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1240.